Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 5 DISTRICT TRUSTEES
33-518. Employee personnel files.

The board of trustees of each school district, including any specially chartered district, shall provide for the establishment and maintenance of a personnel file for each employee of the school district. Each personnel file shall contain any and all material relevant to the evaluation of the employee. The employee shall be provided timely notice of all materials placed in the personnel file and shall be afforded the opportunity to attach a rebuttal to any such materials. Personnel files are declared to be confidential and excepted from public access under any provision of the Idaho Code, including, but not limited to, sections 74-102 and 59-1009, Idaho Code, provided that each employee or designated representative shall be given access to his own personnel file upon request and shall be provided copies of materials contained therein, with the exception of recommendation letters, in a timely manner upon request.

33-519. Release for religious instruction.

Upon application of his parent or guardian, or, if the student has attained the age of eighteen (18) years, upon application of the student, a student attending a public school in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) may be excused from school for a period not exceeding five (5) periods in any week or not exceeding one hundred sixty-five (165) hours per student during any one (1) school year for religious or other purposes. Release time pursuant to this section shall be scheduled by the board of trustees upon application as provided herein and the board shall have reasonable discretion over the scheduling and timing of the release time. Release time pursuant to this section shall not reduce the minimum graduation requirements for accredited Idaho high schools. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to authorize the use of any public school facility for religious instruction. The board of trustees of a school district may not authorize the use of, and public school facilities, personnel or equipment may not be utilized, to maintain attendance records for the benefit of release time classes for religious instruction. No credit shall be awarded by the school or school district for completion of courses during release time for religious purposes. At the discretion of the board credit may be granted for other purposes.

33-520. Policy governing medical inhalers, epinephrine auto-injectors, insulin and blood glucose monitoring supplies.

The board of trustees of each school district, including charter districts, shall adopt a policy permitting the self-administration of medication administered by way of a metered-dose inhaler by a pupil for asthma or other potentially life-threatening respiratory illness or by way of an epinephrine auto-injector for severe allergic reaction (anaphylaxis). On or before September 1, 2016, such boards of trustees shall also adopt a policy permitting the self-administration of diabetes medication and blood glucose monitoring by a pupil with diabetes.

As used in this section:

“Medication” means an epinephrine auto-injector, a metered-dose inhaler or a dry powder inhaler or insulin prescribed by a physician and having an individual label; and

“Self-administration” means a student’s use of medication or of blood glucose monitoring supplies pursuant to prescription or written direction from a physician.

A student who is permitted to self-administer medication or blood glucose monitoring pursuant to this section shall be permitted to possess and use a prescribed inhaler, an epinephrine auto-injector, insulin or blood glucose monitoring supplies at all times.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a school district from requiring pupils to maintain current duplicate prescription medications or blood glucose monitoring supplies with the school nurse or, in the absence of such nurse, with the school administrator.

33-520A. Life-threatening allergies in schools — Guidelines, stock supply of epinephrine auto-injectors and emergency administration.

As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Administer” means the direct application of an epinephrine auto-injector to the body of an individual.

“Designated school personnel” means an employee, agent or volunteer of a school designated by the governing authority of a school who has completed the training to provide or administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a student.

“Epinephrine auto-injector” means a device that automatically injects a premeasured dose of epinephrine.

“Provide” means the supply of one (1) or more epinephrine auto-injectors to an individual.

“School” means any public or nonpublic school.

“Self-administration” means a student or other person’s discretionary use of an epinephrine auto-injector, whether provided by the student or by a school nurse or designated school personnel pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Any physician, advanced practice registered nurse licensed to prescribe or physician assistant licensed to prescribe pursuant to title 54, Idaho Code, may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors in the name of a school to be maintained for use in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Licensed pharmacists and physicians may dispense epinephrine auto-injectors pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with this subsection. A school may maintain a stock supply of epinephrine auto-injectors.

The governing authority of a school may authorize school nurses and designated school personnel to do the following:

Provide an epinephrine auto-injector to a student to self-administer the epinephrine auto-injector in accordance with a prescription specific to the student on file with the school nurse;

Administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a student in accordance with a prescription specific to the student on file with the school nurse; and

Administer an epinephrine auto-injector to any student or other individual on school premises that the school nurse or designated school personnel in good faith believes is experiencing anaphylaxis regardless of whether the student or other individual has a prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector.

A school may enter into arrangements with manufacturers of epinephrine auto-injectors or third-party suppliers of epinephrine auto-injectors to obtain epinephrine auto-injectors at fair market price, reduced price or free.

The governing authority of a school that participates in supplying and administering epinephrine auto-injectors pursuant to the provisions of this section shall do the following:

Require each school that maintains a stock supply and administers epinephrine auto-injectors to submit a report of each incident at the school or related school event involving a severe allergic reaction or the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector to the governing authority of the school or its designee; and

Establish detailed standards for training programs that must be completed by designated school personnel in order to provide or administer an epinephrine auto-injector in accordance with this section. Such training may be conducted online and, at a minimum, shall cover:
(i) Techniques on how to recognize symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis;

There shall be no civil liability for any damages for a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, physician’s assistant or pharmacist providing a prescription or standing protocol for school epinephrine auto-injectors consistent with the standard of care for the provider. Further, there shall be no civil liability for damages for a school or its employees or agents for any injuries that result from the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine auto-injector regardless of whether authorization for use was given by the student’s parents, guardian or medical provider provided the actions taken in administering or providing the injector were reasonable under the circumstances. The liability protections in this section do not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence, those that are reckless or that constitute willful and wanton behavior. The liability protections in this section are in addition to any provided under section 5-330, Idaho Code.

33-521. Employee severance in consolidated district.

The board of trustees of any school district newly formed within the last twelve (12) months through the consolidation of two (2) or more school districts may offer a one (1) time severance payment to a maximum of ten percent (10%) of the employees that were previously employed by the separate school districts. Such severance offers shall be made entirely at the discretion of the board of trustees, and shall not be bound by custom, seniority or contractual commitment. Employees are under no obligation to accept a severance offer. Any employee accepting a severance payment shall not be eligible for reemployment by the school district for a one (1) year period thereafter.

The severance payment shall consist of fifty-five percent (55%) of the salary-based apportionment funds allocated for the employee in the last year, plus any applicable state paid employee benefits. Such severance shall be reduced by one-half (½) for any employee who is simultaneously receiving a disbursement of early retirement incentive funds. The state department of education shall reimburse eligible school districts for one hundred percent (100%) of such costs, upon application by the school district.

33-522. Financial emergency.

Prior to declaring a financial emergency, the board of trustees shall hold a public meeting for the purpose of receiving input concerning possible solutions to the financial problems facing the school district.

If the state department of education certifies that one (1) or more of the conditions in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection are met, then the board of trustees may declare a financial emergency if it determines that the condition in paragraph (f) of this subsection is also met. Alternatively, the board of trustees may declare a financial emergency if it determines that either of the conditions in paragraph (d) or (e) of this subsection are met and the state department of education certifies that the condition set forth in paragraph (f) of this subsection is also met.

Any of the base salary multipliers in section 33-1004E, Idaho Code, are reduced by one and one-half percent (1 ½%) or more from any prior fiscal year.

The minimum instructional salary provision in section 33-1004E, Idaho Code, is reduced by one and one-half percent (1 ½%) or more from any prior fiscal year.

The amount of total general fund money appropriated per support unit is reduced by greater than three percent (3%) from the original general fund appropriation per support unit of any prior fiscal year.

The amount of property tax revenue to be collected by the school district that may be used for any general fund purpose, with the exception of any emergency levy funds, is reduced from the prior fiscal year, and the amount of said reduction represents more than one and one-half percent (1 ½%) of the school district’s general fund budget for combined state and local revenues from the prior fiscal year.

The school district’s general fund has decreased by at least one and one-half percent (1 ½%) from the previous year’s level due to a decrease in funding or natural disaster, but not as a result of a drop in the number of support units or the index multiplier calculated pursuant to section 33-1004A, Idaho Code, or a change in the emergency levy.

The school district’s unrestricted general fund balance, which excludes funds restricted by state or federal law and considering both anticipated expenditures and revenue, is less than five and one-half percent (5 ½%) of the school district’s unrestricted general fund budget at the time the financial emergency is declared or for the fiscal year for which the financial emergency is declared.

Upon its declaration of a financial emergency, the board of trustees shall:

Have the power to reopen the salary and benefits compensation aspects of the negotiated agreement, including the length of the certificated employee contracts and the amount of compensation and benefits; and

If the parties to the negotiated agreement mutually agree, reopen other matters contained within the negotiated agreement directly affecting the financial circumstances in the school district.

If, after the declaration of a financial emergency pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, both parties have met and conferred in good faith and an agreement has not been reached, the board of trustees may impose its last, best offer, following the outcome of the due process hearing held pursuant to section 33-515(7), Idaho Code.
(5) A financial emergency declared pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be effective for only one (1) fiscal year at a time and shall not be declared by the board of trustees for a second consecutive year, unless so qualified by additional reductions pursuant to the conditions listed in subsection (2) of this section.

If the board of trustees exercises the power provided in this subsection consistent with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, both the board of trustees and the local education association shall meet and confer in good faith for the purpose of reaching an agreement on such issues.

(6) The time requirements of sections 33-514(2) and 33-515(2), Idaho Code, shall not apply in the event a financial emergency is declared pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

33-522A. Reduction in force defined.

A reduction in force may occur when there are:

Curriculum or program changes;

Negative changes in the financial conditions of the school district;

Decreases in student enrollment, including overall, by program, by grade or by school; or

Staffing or highly qualified teacher limitations of the district.

For purposes of title 33[, Idaho Code], “reduction in force” means the elimination of a certificated staff position or positions or a portion or percentage of a position or positions, when there is one (1) or more of the following:

The elimination of an entire program or portions of a program;

The elimination of positions in certain grade levels only;

The elimination of a position by category; or

The elimination of a position in an overall review of the district.

The decision to institute a reduction in force and the selection of an employee or employees subject to such reduction shall be at the sole discretion of the board of trustees, except for the following limitation: The decision as to which employee or employees shall be subject to such reduction shall not be made solely on consideration of employee seniority or contract status.
(3)(a) The decision to institute a reduction in force and the selection of an employee or employees subject to such reduction shall be at the sole discretion of the board of trustees, except for the following limitation: The decision as to which employee or employees shall be subject to such reduction shall not be made solely on consideration of employee seniority or contract status.

Each school district may adopt a policy establishing an equitable method of recalling individuals subject to a reduction in force if positions become available subsequent to the reduction in force.

33-523. STEM diploma.

For purposes of this section, “STEM” means science, technology, engineering and mathematics.

A public school student who successfully completes all graduation requirements established by the state board of education may receive a high school diploma designated as a STEM diploma if the student earned at least:

Eight (8) credits in mathematics;

Eight (8) credits in science; and

In addition to the credits listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, five (5) credits in the student’s choice of any or all subjects of science, technology, engineering or mathematics.

This section does not require a student to complete more than the total credits required to graduate as determined by the state board of education.

A student who has completed eight (8) or more credits in mathematics that include algebra II or a higher-level mathematics class before the student’s senior year is not required to take a mathematics class in the student’s senior year.

Each school district and public charter school may create a diploma with a special STEM designation for students who meet the requirements of this section.

The state board of education may promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

33-524. Biliteracy diploma.

For purposes of this section, “world language” means a language other than English.

A public school student who successfully completes all graduation requirements established by the state board of education may receive a high school diploma bearing a state seal of biliteracy if the student:

Demonstrates proficiency in English according to an assessment or other method designated by the state board of education; and

Demonstrates proficiency in at least one (1) world language by:

Passing a foreign language advanced placement examination with a score of three (3) or higher;

Passing an international baccalaureate examination with a score of four (4) or higher;

Demonstrating intermediate mid level proficiency or higher in the world language based on the American council on the teaching of foreign languages (ACTFL) proficiency guidelines, using assessments approved by the state board of education;

Qualifying for four (4) competency-based credits by demonstrating proficiency in the world language at the intermediate mid level or higher based on the ACTFL proficiency guidelines, according to the school district’s or public charter school’s policy and procedure for competency-based credits for world languages; or

Demonstrating proficiency in speaking, writing, and reading the world language through other national or international assessments approved by the state board of education at a level comparable to the intermediate mid level or higher in the ACTFL proficiency guidelines.

This section does not require a student to complete more than the total credits required to graduate as determined by the state board of education.

Each school district and public charter school may create a diploma indicating that a student has earned the state seal of biliteracy for students who meet the requirements of this section.

The state board of education shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.